Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.420

Washington—British Columbia interparliamentary exchange group.

A Washington state—British Columbia interparliamentary exchange group is created. The purpose of the group is to facilitate legislator-to-legislator communication between the two governments, in coordination with the province of British Columbia. The state's representative for the group is the chair of the legislative committee on economic development and international relations.

[ 2024 c 336 s 6.]